Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.22
Broker, failure to comply with separate bank accounts and trust account provisions; report to Attorney General; action by Attorney General; receiver.

Whenever it shall appear to the commission from any examination or report provided by the laws of this state that a broker has failed to comply with the provisions of section 81-885.21, or if any broker shall refuse to submit his or her books, papers, and affairs to the inspection of any examiner, the commission shall have reason to conclude that the trust account of such broker is in an unsafe or unsound condition and the commission shall forthwith submit a complete report to the Attorney General of all information available to it. An action may be brought by the State of Nebraska to enjoin such broker from engaging in or continuing such violation or doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof. In any such action an order or judgment may be entered awarding such preliminary or final injunction as may be deemed proper. In addition to all other means provided by law for the enforcement of a restraining order or injunction, the court in which such action is brought shall have power and jurisdiction to impound and appoint a receiver for the property and business of the defendant, including books, papers, documents, and records pertaining thereto or as much thereof as the court may deem reasonably necessary to prevent violations of the law or injury to the public through or by means of the use of such property and business. Such receiver, when so appointed and qualified, shall have such powers and duties as to custody, collection, administration, winding up, and liquidation of such property and business as shall, from time to time, be conferred upon him or her by the court.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 22;

Laws 1978, LB 361, § 9;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 19.